Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska58-232
Executive director; meetings; records; duties.

The executive director shall attend the meetings of the members of the authority, keep a record of the proceedings of the authority, and maintain and be custodian of all books, documents, and papers filed with the authority, of the minute book or journal of the authority, and of its official seal. The executive director may cause copies to be made of all minutes and other records and documents of the authority and may give certificates under seal of the authority to the effect that such copies are true copies, and all persons dealing with the authority may rely upon such certificates.

Laws 1983, LB 626, § 32;

Laws 1991, LB 253, § 34.